District of Columbia statutes.
18-105

Retention or demand of void devise or legacy by attesting witness prohibited.

A person to whom a beneficial devise, legacy, estate, interest, gift, or power of appointment is given or made in a will or codicil, which is void under section 18-103 , may not, in any manner or under any color or pretense whatsoever:

(1)

demand or take possession of or receive any profits or benefit of or from the devise, legacy, estate, interest, gift, or power of appointment so given or made; or

(2)

demand, receive, or accept from another person the beneficial devise, legacy, estate, interest, gift, or power of appointment or any satisfaction or compensation therefor.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 686, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 18-105.
1973 Ed., § 18-105.